Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PRETRAINING PROGRAM FOR DIRECT SUPPORT PROFESSIONALS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to the Minnesota Ethnic Providers Network to: (1) develop curriculum for a pretraining program tailored to the educational needs of potential direct support professionals; (2) provide workforce readiness training for individuals entering the field of direct care and support services; (3) expand recruitment efforts to increase direct support professional workforce capacity, particularly among diverse and underrepresented communities; and (4) collaborate with community-based organizations, educational institutions, and providers to support the long-term development of the direct support professionals workforce. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end